California statutes. Penal Code
(b) At any time prior to the setting of an execution date, an incarcerated person whose judgment and sentence of death has been affirmed on direct appeal may file a petition alleging the incarcerated person’s permanent incompetence to be executed. The petition must be verified and supported by either the opinion of a qualified expert that the incarcerated person is permanently incompetent within the meaning of subdivision
 (e) or medical evidence that the incarcerated person has one or more medical or mental health conditions that would support a finding that the incarcerated person is permanently incompetent within the meaning of subdivision (e).

(c) An incarcerated person who has submitted a petition pursuant to subdivision (b) that did not result in a determination that the incarcerated person is permanently incompetent to be executed may submit a renewed petition. A renewed petition must identify with specificity a change in the incarcerated person’s diagnosis or prognosis or change in the law that arose after the determination of the prior request that supports the renewed petition.

(d) For purposes of this section, “incompetent to be executed” means that, due to mental illness or
 disorder, an incarcerated person is unable to rationally understand either the punishment the incarcerated person is about to suffer or why the incarcerated person is to suffer it.

(e) For purposes of this section, “permanent incompetence to be executed” means that the incarcerated person meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The incarcerated person is presently incompetent to be executed.

(2) The nature of the mental illness or disorder giving rise to incompetence is such that the incarcerated person’s competence to be executed is unlikely to ever be restored.

(f) Following the filing of the petition specified in subdivisions (a), (b), or (c), the
 court shall hold a hearing if there is reason to believe the incarcerated person is presently incompetent to be executed, as specified in subdivision (a), or there is reason to believe the incarcerated person is permanently incompetent to be executed, as specified in subdivision (b) and (c). The court may decline to hold a hearing if the parties stipulate that no hearing is necessary.

(g) When an incarcerated person proffers an expert opinion that the incarcerated person is incompetent to be executed, another expert’s opinion that concludes otherwise is an insufficient basis to deny a hearing.

(h) For purposes of this section, a claim in a petition for writ of habeas corpus alleging permanent incompetence to be executed that was filed before January 1, 2023, and that is still
 pending, shall be treated as a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (b). In those cases, if the court has already concluded that the petitioner made a prima facie showing of entitlement to relief, it shall proceed to a hearing pursuant to this section and Sections 3702 and 3703, unless the parties stipulate otherwise.

(i) A petition filed under this section by an incarcerated person under sentence of death constitutes a petition for writ of habeas corpus within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 1509 of the Penal Code and is subject to the requirements of that section. A petition filed by an incarcerated person under this chapter constitutes a claim that the petitioner is ineligible for a sentence of death within the meaning of subdivision (d) of Section 1509 of the Penal Code. No provision of this chapter alters,
 changes, or amends any of the statutory provisions contained in the Death Penalty Reform and Savings Act of 2016 enacted by the voters in the November 2016 election within the meaning of Section 20 of that act.

(j) An attorney acting on behalf of the incarcerated person who suspects that the incarcerated person may be incompetent to be executed may obtain an order from the superior court from which the incarcerated person’s conviction and sentence arises directing the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to release the incarcerated person’s medical and psychiatric records to the attorney
 or the attorney’s representative for use under this section.

(k) This section shall apply retroactively.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 795, Sec. 5.   (AB 2657)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3702.

(a) The prosecuting agency and the incarcerated person under sentence of death may produce witnesses at any hearing held regarding a petition filed pursuant to Section 3701.

(b) When the court concludes that there is reason to believe the incarcerated person is presently or permanently incompetent to be executed, the court shall hear proof produced by either party. The court may compel the attendance of witnesses, by process of subpoena and attachment, and to perform all other acts necessary to a full and fair hearing and determination of the case.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 795, Sec. 7.   (AB 2657)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3703.

(a) On decision of a petition filed pursuant to Section 3701, the court shall issue a statement explaining the legal and factual basis for the decision.

(b) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the incarcerated person is competent to be executed, the court shall deny the petition.

(c) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the incarcerated person is permanently incompetent to be executed within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 3701, the court shall vacate the sentence or sentences of death and resentence the incarcerated person to life without the
 possibility of parole.

(d) In a proceeding under subdivision (a) of Section 3701, if the court finds that the incarcerated person is incompetent to be executed, but does not find by a preponderance of the evidence that competence is unlikely to be restored, the court shall order the warden to suspend the execution and order that the incarcerated person be taken to a medical facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and be kept in safe confinement until their competence to be executed is restored. If the prosecuting agency alerts the court that it believes the incarcerated person’s competence has been restored, the court shall again initiate the procedure set forth in Section 3700 and hold a hearing. In that hearing, the prosecution bears the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the incarcerated person
 is competent to be executed.

(e) The decision denying or granting the petition will be subject to review under Section 1509.1. An appeal from a decision under this chapter shall not be considered successive, nor shall it render any subsequent appeals successive within the meaning of Section 1509.1.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 795, Sec. 9.   (AB 2657)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3705.

If there is good reason to believe that a female against whom a judgment of death is rendered is pregnant, such proceedings must be had as are provided in Section 3701, except that instead of a jury, as therein provided, the court may summon three disinterested physicians, of good standing in their profession, to inquire into the supposed pregnancy, who shall, in the presence of the court, but with closed doors, if requested by the defendant, examine the defendant and hear any evidence that may be produced, and make a written finding and certificate of their conclusion, to be approved by the court and spread upon the minutes. The provisions of Section 3702 apply to the proceedings upon such inquiry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

3706.

If it is found that the female is not pregnant, the warden must execute the judgment; if it is found that she is pregnant the warden must suspend the execution of the judgment, and transmit a certified copy of the finding and certificate to the Governor. When the Governor receives from the warden a certificate that the defendant is no longer pregnant, he must issue to the warden this warrant appointing a day for the execution of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4. COUNTY JAILS, FARMS AND CAMPS [4000. - 4351.]



  CHAPTER 1. County Jails [4000. - 4033.]

4000.

The common jails in the several counties of this state are kept by the sheriffs of the counties in which they are respectively situated, and are used as follows:

1. For the detention of persons committed in order to secure their attendance as witnesses in criminal cases;

2. For the detention of persons charged with crime and committed for trial;

3. For the confinement of persons committed for contempt, or upon civil process, or by other authority of law;

4. For the confinement of persons sentenced to imprisonment
 therein upon a conviction for crime.

5. For the confinement of persons pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3454 for a violation of the terms and conditions of their postrelease community supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 34.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sheriff of any county may transfer prisoners committed to any jail of the county to any industrial road camp maintained by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 897, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

Each county jail must contain a sufficient number of rooms to allow all persons belonging to either one of the following classes to be confined separately and distinctly from persons belonging to either of the other classes:

1. Persons committed on criminal process and detained for trial;

2. Persons already convicted of crime and held under sentence;

3. Persons detained as witnesses or held under civil process, or under an order imposing punishment for a contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.1.

(a) No law enforcement or correctional official shall give, offer, or promise to give any monetary payment in excess of fifty dollars ($50) in return for an in-custody informant’s testimony in any criminal proceeding. Nothing contained herein shall prohibit payments incidental to the informant’s testimony such as expenses incurred for witness or immediate family relocation, lodging, housing, meals, phone calls, travel, or witness fees authorized by law, provided those payments are supported by appropriate documentation demonstrating that the money was used for the purposes for which it was given.

(b) No law enforcement agency and no in-custody informant acting as an agent for the agency, may take some action, beyond merely listening to statements of a defendant, that is deliberately designed to elicit incriminating remarks.

(c) As used in this section, an “in-custody informant” means a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 1127a.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.2.

(a) Each county jail shall, upon detention of a person, ask if the person has served in the United States military and document the person’s response.

(b) The county jail shall make this
 information available to the person, his or her counsel, and the district attorney.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   (AB 2568)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

(a) Persons committed on criminal process and detained for trial, persons convicted and under sentence, and persons committed upon civil process, shall not be kept or put in the same room, nor shall male and female prisoners, except spouses, sleep, dress or undress, bathe, or perform eliminatory functions in the same room. However, persons committed on criminal process and detained for trial may be kept or put in the same room with persons convicted and under sentence for the purpose of participating in supervised activities and for the purpose of housing, provided, that the housing occurs as a result of a classification procedure that is based upon objective criteria, including consideration of criminal sophistication, seriousness of crime
 charged, presence or absence of assaultive behavior, age, and other criteria that will provide for the safety of the prisoners and staff.

(b) Inmates who are held pending civil process under the sexually violent predator laws shall be held in administrative segregation. For purposes of this subdivision, administrative segregation means separate and secure housing that does not involve any deprivation of privileges other than what is necessary to protect the inmates and staff. Consistent with Section 1610, to the extent possible, the person shall continue in his or her course of treatment, if any. An alleged sexually violent predator held pending civil process may waive placement in secure housing by petitioning the court for a waiver. In order to grant the waiver, the court must find that the waiver is voluntary and intelligent, and that granting the waiver would not interfere with any treatment programming for the person requesting the waiver.
 A person granted a waiver shall be placed with inmates charged with similar offenses or with similar criminal histories, based on the objective criteria set forth in subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose any requirement upon a county to confine male and female prisoners in the same or an adjoining facility or impose any duty upon a county to establish or maintain programs which involve the joint participation of male and female prisoners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 74.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2020, the sheriff of each county or the administrator of each county jail shall develop and implement an infant and toddler breast milk feeding policy for lactating inmates detained in or sentenced to a county jail. The policy shall be based on currently accepted best practices. The policy shall include all of the following provisions:

(1) Procedures for providing medically appropriate support and care related to the cessation of lactation or weaning.

(2) Procedures providing for human milk expression, disposal, and same-day storage for later retrieval and delivery to an infant or toddler by an approved person, at the option of the lactating inmate and with the approval of the facility administrator.

(3) Procedures for conditioning an inmate’s participation in the program upon the inmate undergoing drug screening.

(b) The infant and toddler breast milk feeding policy for lactating inmates shall be posted in all locations in the jail where medical care is provided and the provisions of the policy shall be communicated to all staff persons who interact with or oversee pregnant or lactating inmates.

(c) This
 section applies without regard to whether the jail is operated pursuant to a contract with a private contractor and without regard to whether the inmate has been charged with or convicted of a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 944, Sec. 1.   (AB 2507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

Whenever any weapon or other personal property is taken from an arrested person, it shall be the duty of the desk clerk or other proper officer of any city, county or city and county jail, to which such person is committed for detention, to give a receipt to such person without delay for the property taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

A prisoner committed to the county jail for examination, or upon conviction for a public offense, must be actually confined in the jail until legally discharged; and if the prisoner is permitted to go at large out of the jail, except by virtue of a legal order or process, it is an escape; provided, however, that during the pendency of a criminal proceeding, the court before which said proceeding is pending may make a legal order, good cause appearing therefor, for the removal of the prisoner from the county jail in custody of the sheriff. In courts where there is a marshal, the marshal shall maintain custody of such prisoner while the prisoner is in the court facility pursuant to such court order. The superior court of the county may make a legal order, good cause appearing therefor, for the removal of prisoners confined in the county jail, after conviction, in the custody of the sheriff.

If facilities are no longer available in the county jail due to crowded conditions, a sheriff may transfer a person committed to the county jail upon conviction for a public offense to facilities which are available in the city jail, as provided for in Section 4004.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 433.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.5.

(a) A city may furnish facilities to be used for holding prisoners held for examination or during trial without cost to the county or upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the governing body of the city and the board of supervisors, and the marshal may keep the prisoners in their custody in the city jail.

(b) A city may furnish facilities to be used for holding persons convicted of a public offense who have been transferred from the county jail by the sheriff due to crowded conditions upon those terms as may be agreed upon by the governing body of the city and the board of supervisors. The agreed terms may indicate that the facilities are to be provided free of charge to the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the sheriff shall receive, and keep in the county jail, any prisoner committed thereto by process or order issued under the authority of the United States, until he or she is discharged according to law, as if he or she had been committed under process issued under the authority of this state; provision being made by the United States for the support of the prisoner.

(b) The sheriff shall receive, and keep in the county jail, any prisoner committed thereto by process or order issued under the authority of the United States, until he or she is discharged according to law, as if he or she had been committed under process issued under the authority of this state, but only if the sheriff determines that adequate space in appropriate detention areas currently exists for this purpose. Provision shall be made by the United States for the support of the prisoner. This subdivision shall apply only in counties where a facility operated by the United States Bureau of Prisons exists within 200 miles of the county seat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 523, Sec. 1.   Effective July 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.

A sheriff, to whose custody a prisoner is committed as provided in the last section, is answerable for his safekeeping in the courts of the United States, according to the laws thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county board of supervisors or city council may enter into a contract with the federal government, or any department or agency thereof, to manage, control, and operate a federal prison located within the boundaries of that county or city.

(b) If a city or county enters into a contract pursuant to subdivision (a), the sheriff or chief of police, as appropriate, shall have sole and exclusive authority to keep the prison and the prisoners in it.

(c) If a city or county enters into a contract pursuant to subdivision (a), the employees working in the prison shall be employees of, and under the authority of, the sheriff or chief of police, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 468, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4007.

When there is no jail in the county, or when the jail becomes unfit or unsafe for the confinement of prisoners, the judge of the superior court may, by a written order filed with the clerk of the court, designate the jail of a contiguous county for the confinement of any prisoner of his or her county, and may at any time modify or vacate the order.

When there are reasonable grounds to believe that a prisoner may be forcibly removed from a county jail, the sheriff may remove the prisoner to any California state prison for safekeeping and it is the duty of the warden of the prison to accept and detain the prisoner in his or her custody until his or her removal is ordered by the superior court of the county from which he or she was delivered. Immediately upon receiving the prisoner the warden shall advise the Director of Corrections of that fact in writing.

When a county prisoner requires medical treatment necessitating hospitalization which cannot be provided at the county jail or county hospital because of lack of adequate detention facilities, and when the prisoner also presents a serious custodial problem because of his or her past or present behavior, the judge of the superior court may, on the request of the county sheriff and with the consent of the Director of Corrections, designate by written order the nearest state prison or correctional facility which would be able to provide the necessary medical treatment and secure confinement of the prisoner. The written order of the judge shall be filed with the clerk of the court. The court shall immediately calendar the matter for a hearing to determine whether the order shall continue or be rescinded. The hearing shall be held within 48 hours of the initial order or the next judicial day, whichever occurs later. The prisoner shall not be transferred to the state prison or correctional facility prior to the hearing, except upon a determination by the physician responsible for the prisoner’s health care that a medical emergency exists which requires the transfer of the prisoner to the state prison or correctional facility prior to the hearing. The prisoner shall be entitled to be present at the hearing and to be represented by counsel. The prisoner may waive his or her right to this hearing in writing at any time. If the prisoner waives his or her right to the hearing, the county sheriff shall notify the prisoner’s attorney of the transfer within 48 hours, or the next business day, whichever is later. The court may modify or vacate the order at any time.

The rate of compensation for the prisoner’s medical treatment and confinement within a California state prison or correctional facility shall be established by the Department of Corrections, and shall be charged against the county making the request.

When there are reasonable grounds to believe that there is a prisoner in a county jail who is likely to be a threat to other persons in the facility or who is likely to cause substantial damage to the facility, the judge of the superior court may, on the request of the county sheriff and with the consent of the Director of Corrections, designate by written order the nearest state prison or correctional facility which would be able to secure confinement of the prisoner, subject to space available. The written order of the judge must be filed with the clerk of the court. The court shall immediately calendar the matter for a hearing to determine whether the order shall continue or be rescinded. The hearing shall be held within 48 hours of the initial order or the next judicial day, whichever occurs later. The prisoner shall be entitled to be present at the hearing and to be represented by counsel. The court may modify or vacate that order at any time. The rate of compensation for the prisoner’s confinement within a California state prison or correctional facility shall be established by the Department of Corrections and shall be charged against the county making the request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 562.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4008.

A copy of the appointment, certified by the clerk of the court, must be served on the sheriff or keeper of the jail designated, who must receive into the jail all prisoners authorized to be confined therein, pursuant to Section 4007, and who is responsible for the safekeeping of the persons so committed, in the same manner and to the same extent as if the sheriff or keeper of the jail were sheriff of the county for whose use the jail is designated, and with respect to the persons so committed the sheriff or keeper of the jail is deemed the sheriff of the county from which they were removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 563.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4009.

When a jail is erected in a county for the use of which the designation was made, or its jail is rendered fit and safe for the confinement of prisoners, the judge of the superior court of that county must, by a written revocation, filed with the clerk of the court, declare that the necessity for the designation has ceased, and that it is revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 564.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

The clerk of the court must immediately serve a copy of the revocation upon the sheriff of the county, who must thereupon remove the prisoners to the jail of the county from which the removal was had.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 565.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.

(a) When it is made to appear to any judge by affidavit of the sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities or district attorney and oral testimony that a prisoner confined in any city or county jail within the jurisdiction of the court requires medical or surgical treatment necessitating hospitalization, which treatment cannot be furnished or supplied at such city or county jail, the court in its discretion may order the removal of such person or persons from such city or county jail to the county hospital in such county; provided, if there is no county hospital in such county, then to any hospital designated by such court; and it shall be the duty of the sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities to maintain the necessary guards, who may be private security guards, for the safekeeping of such prisoner, the expense of which shall be a charge against the county.

(b) The cost of such medical services and such hospital care and treatment shall be charged against the county subject to subdivisions (c) and (d), in the case of a prisoner in or taken from the county jail, or against the city in the case of a prisoner in or taken from the city jail, and the city or county may recover the same by appropriate action from the person so served or cared for, or any person or agency responsible for his care and maintenance. If the prisoner is in the county jail under contract with a city or under some other arrangement with the city to keep the city prisoner in the county jail, then the city shall be charged, subject to subdivisions (c) and (d), for the prisoner’s care and maintenance with the same right of recovery against any responsible person or any other agency.

(c) When such prisoner is poor and indigent the cost of such medical services and such hospital care and treatment shall, in the case of persons removed from the city jail be paid out of the general fund of such city, and in the case of persons removed from the county jail to a hospital other than a county hospital, such cost shall be paid out of the general fund of such county or city and county. In the case of city jail prisoners removed to the county hospital, the cost of such hospital care and treatment to be paid by the city to the county, shall be the rate per day fixed by the board of supervisors of such county. Such board of supervisors may, but need not, fix different rates for different classes of patients, or for different wards, and any and all such rates may be changed by such board of supervisors at any time, but shall at all times approximate as nearly as may be, the average actual cost to the county of such hospital care and treatment either in such wards or for such classes of patients or otherwise.

(d) In the event such prisoner is financially able to pay for his care, support and maintenance, the medical superintendent of such hospital other than a county hospital may, with the approval of such judge, enter into a special agreement with such person, or with his relatives or friends, for his care, support, maintenance, and other hospital expenses.

Any prisoner may decline such care or treatment and provide other care and treatment for himself at his own expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 124.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 29602 of the Government Code and any other provisions of this chapter, a county, city or the Department of the Youth Authority is authorized to make claim for and recovery of the costs of necessary hospital, medical, surgical, dental, or optometric care rendered to any prisoner confined in a county or city jail or any juvenile confined in a detention facility, who would otherwise be entitled to that care under the Medi-Cal Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) Part 3, Division 9, of the Welfare and Institutions Code), and who is eligible for that care on the first day of confinement or detention, to the extent that federal financial participation is available, or under the provisions of any private program or policy for that care, and the county, city or the Department of the Youth Authority shall be liable only for the costs of that care as cannot be recovered pursuant to this section. No person who is eligible for Medi-Cal shall be eligible for benefits under the provisions of this section, and no county or city or the Department of the Youth Authority is authorized to make a claim for any recovery of costs for services for that person, unless federal financial participation is available for all or part of the costs of providing services to that person under the Medi-Cal Act.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any county or city making a claim pursuant to this section and under the Medi-Cal Act shall reimburse the Health Care Deposit Fund for the state costs of paying those medical claims. Funds allocated to the county from the County Health Services Fund pursuant to Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 16700) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code may be utilized by the county or city to make that reimbursement.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 29602 of the Government Code and any other provisions of this chapter, to the extent that recovery of costs of necessary hospital, medical, surgical, dental, or optometric care are not accomplished under subdivision (a), a county, city, or the Department of the Youth Authority is authorized to make claim for and recover from a prisoner or a person legally responsible for a prisoner’s care and maintenance the costs of necessary hospital, medical, surgical, dental, or optometric care rendered to any prisoner confined in a county or city jail, or any juvenile confined in a detention facility, where the prisoner or the person legally responsible for the prisoner’s care and maintenance is financially able to pay for the prisoner’s care, support, and maintenance. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize a city, a county, or the Department of the Youth Authority to make a claim against a spouse of a prisoner.

(c) Necessary hospital, medical, dental, or optometric care, as used in this section, does not include care rendered with respect to an injury occurring during confinement in a county or city jail or juvenile detention facility, nor does it include any care or testing mandated by law.

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) shall apply only where there has been a determination of the present ability of the prisoner or responsible third party to pay all or a portion of the cost of necessary hospital, medical, surgical, dental, or optometric care. The person legally responsible for the prisoner’s care shall provide a financial disclosure statement, executed under penalty of perjury, based on his or her past year’s income tax return, to the Department of the Youth Authority. The city, county, or Department of the Youth Authority may request that the prisoner appear before a designated hearing officer for an inquiry into the ability of the prisoner or responsible third party to pay all or part of the cost of the care provided.

(e) Notice of this request shall be provided to the prisoner or responsible third party, which shall contain the following:

(1) A statement of the cost of the care provided to the prisoner.

(2) The prisoner’s or responsible third party’s procedural rights under this section.

(3) The time limit within which the prisoner or responsible third party may respond.

(4) A warning that if the prisoner or responsible third party fails to appear before, or respond to, the designated officer, the officer may petition the court for an order requiring him or her to make payment of the full cost of the care provided to the prisoner.

(f) At the hearing, the prisoner or responsible third party shall be entitled to, but shall not be limited to, all of the following rights:

(1) The right to be heard in person.

(2) The right to present witnesses and documentary evidence.

(3) The right to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses.

(4) The right to have adverse evidence disclosed to him or her.

(5) The right to a written statement of the findings of the designated hearing officer.

(g) If the hearing officer determines that the prisoner or responsible third party has the present ability to pay all or a part of the cost, the officer shall set the amount to be reimbursed, and shall petition the court to order the prisoner or responsible third party to pay the sum to the city, county, or state, in the manner in which it finds reasonable and compatible to the prisoner’s or responsible third party’s financial ability. The court’s order shall be enforceable in the manner provided for money judgments in a civil action under the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) At any time prior to satisfaction of the judgment rendered according to the terms of this section, a prisoner or responsible third party against whom a judgment has been rendered, may petition the rendering court for a modification of the previous judgment on the grounds of a change of circumstance with regard to his or her ability to pay the judgment. The prisoner or responsible third party shall be advised of this right at the time the original judgment is rendered.

(i) As used in this section, “ability to pay” means the overall capacity of the prisoner or responsible third party to reimburse the costs, or a portion of the costs, of the care provided to the prisoner, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The prisoner’s or responsible third party’s present financial position.

(2) The prisoner’s or responsible third party’s discernible future financial position.

(3) The likelihood that the prisoner or responsible third party will be able to obtain employment in the future.

(4) Any other factor or factors which may bear upon the prisoner’s or responsible third party’s financial position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.2.

A sheriff, chief or director of corrections, or chief of police shall not charge a fee for an inmate-initiated medical visit of an inmate confined in a county or city jail.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 570, Sec. 2.   (AB 45)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4011.1, a sheriff, chief or director of corrections, or chief of police shall not charge a fee for durable medical equipment or medical supplies provided to an inmate confined in a county or city jail as medically necessary to ensure the inmate has equal access to jail services, programs, or activities.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “durable medical equipment” means equipment that is prescribed by a licensed provider to meet the medical needs of an inmate and that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The equipment can withstand repeated use.

(B) The equipment is used to serve
 a medical purpose.

(C) The equipment is not normally useful to an individual in the absence of an illness, injury, functional impairment, or congenital anomaly.

(D) The equipment is appropriate for use in or out of the jail.

(2) Durable medical equipment includes, but is not limited to, eyeglasses, artificial eyes, dentures, artificial limbs, orthopedic braces and shoes, and hearing aids.

(c) For purposes of this section, “medical supplies” means supplies that are prescribed by a licensed provider to meet the medical needs of an inmate and that meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The supplies cannot withstand repeated use.

(2) The supplies are usually disposable in nature.

(3) The supplies are used to serve a medical purpose.

(4) The supplies are not normally useful to an individual in the absence of an illness, injury, functional impairment, or congenital anomaly.

(5) The supplies are intended for use in an outpatient setting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 230.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.5.

(a) If a sheriff or jailer determines that a prisoner in a county jail or a city jail under his or her charge is in need of immediate medical or hospital care, and that the health and welfare of the prisoner will be injuriously affected unless
 the prisoner is forthwith removed to a hospital, the sheriff or jailer may authorize the immediate removal of the prisoner under guard to a hospital, without first obtaining a court order as provided in Section 4011. If the condition of the prisoner prevents his or her return to the jail within 48 hours from the time of his
 or her
 removal, the sheriff or jailer shall apply to a judge of the superior court for an order authorizing the continued absence of the prisoner from the jail in the manner provided in Section 4011. The provisions of Section 4011 governing the cost of medical and hospital care of prisoners and the liability for those costs shall apply to the cost of, and the liability for, medical or hospital care of prisoners removed from jail pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “immediate medical or hospital care” includes, but is not limited to, critical specialty medical procedures or treatment, such as dialysis, which cannot be furnished,
 performed, or supplied at a county jail or city jail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 65, Sec. 1.   (AB 1703)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.6.
